District of Columbia statutes.
6-1053

Presentation of Comprehensive Housing Strategy; public meetings.

(a)

Within 12 months after the Council’s confirmation of the Mayor’s nominations to the Task Force, the Task Force shall present the Comprehensive Housing Strategy to the Council and the Mayor.

(b)

The Task Force shall hold at least 2 public meetings, which shall be convened at the following times:

(1)

Within 60 days after the Council’s confirmation of the Task Force members; and

(2)

After a draft of the Comprehensive Housing Strategy has been developed but prior to presenting the final Comprehensive Housing Strategy to the Council and the Mayor under section (a) of this section.

(c)

At least 30 days before a public meeting, the Task Force shall provide the general public the following information regarding the meeting, the:

(1)

Time;

(2)

Date; and

(3)

Location.

(d)

The Task Force shall provide all interested persons a reasonable opportunity to be heard at the public meetings.

History

March 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-73, § 4, 50 DCR 10909

Section References

This section is referenced in § 6-1054.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 4 of Comprehensive Housing Strategy Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-52, December 9, 2003, law notification 51 DCR 1787).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Comprehensive Housing Strategy Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-143, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6888).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 4 of Comprehensive Housing Strategy Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-215, November 7, 2003, 50 DCR 10023).